Utah statutes.
48-1d-1209.   Transfer of registration.

(1)  When a registered foreign limited liability partnership has merged into a foreign entity that is not registered to do business in this state or has converted to a foreign entity required to register with the division to do business in this state, the foreign entity shall deliver to the division for filing an application for transfer of registration.  The application must state:

(a)  the name of the registered foreign limited liability partnership before the merger or conversion;

(b)  that before the merger or conversion the registration pertained to a foreign limited liability partnership;

(c)  the name of the applicant foreign entity into which the foreign limited liability partnership has merged or to which it has been converted, and, if the name does not comply with Section 48-1d-1105, an alternate name adopted pursuant to Subsection 48-1d-1206(1) or similar provision of law of this state governing a foreign entity registered to do business in this state of the same type as the applicable foreign entity;

(d)  the type of entity of the applicant foreign entity and its jurisdiction of formation;

(e)  the street and mailing addresses of the principal office of the applicant foreign entity and, if the law of that entity's jurisdiction of formation requires the entity to maintain an office in that jurisdiction, the street and mailing addresses of that office; and

(f)  the information required under Subsection 16-17-203(1).

(2)  When an application for transfer of registration takes effect, the registration of the foreign limited liability partnership to do business in this state is transferred without interruption to the foreign entity into which the foreign limited liability partnership has merged or to which it has been converted.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

